Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1454
Committee; campaign statement; filing; period covered.

Any committee which supports or opposes a candidate or the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question shall file a legibly printed or typed campaign statement pursuant to sections 49-1459 and 49-1461. The period covered by a campaign statement is the period beginning with the day after the closing date of the most recent campaign statement filed and ending with the closing date of the campaign statement due. If the committee filing the campaign statement has not previously filed a campaign statement, the period covered shall begin on the date the person or persons forming the committee raised, received, or spent any money.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 54;

Laws 1980, LB 535, § 9;

Laws 1983, LB 230, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 480, § 4.

The Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act requires candidate committees to file two preelection campaign statements and one postelection campaign statement for both the primary and general elections. Nebraska Legislature on behalf of State v. Hergert, 271 Neb. 976, 720 N.W.2d 372 (2006).